DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 1HD

DI-127
—FTE)

DIAVF-01

DTC 38(1) | TransmissionFluid Temperature Sensor Circuit
Malfunction (ATF Temperature SensorNo. 1)
DTC 38(2) Transmission Fluid Temperature Sensor No. 2 Cir-
cuit Malfunction (ATF Temperature Sensor No. 2)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The ATF temperature sensor converts fluid temperature into a resistance value which is input into the Engine
& ECT ECU.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either (a) or (b) is detected for 0.5 sec. or more.
(1-trip detectionlogic)

¢ Openorshortin ATF temperature sensor No. 1 circuit

38(1) (a) Temp. sensorresistanceislessthan 79 Q ¢ ATFtemperature sensor No. 1
(b) Afterthe engine has been operating for 15 minutes or *Engine & ECTECU
more, the resistance atthe temp. sensoris more than 156 k 2
DTCis detectedfor0.5sec. ormore (1 —trip detectionlogic) ¢ Openin ATF temperature sensor No. 2 circuit
38(2) ATFtemperature sensorresistance ismorethan 156 k Q. after « ATFtemperature sensorNo. 2
started engine for 15 minutes or more *Engineand ECT ECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checktransmission wire.

D11994

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP

(RM970E)

PREPARATION:

Disconnect the transmission wire connector from the transmis-
sion.

CHECK:

(a) Measuretheresistance betweenterminals OT+and OT -
(b) Measure the resistance between terminals OT2+ and

oT2-.
OK:
79 Q - 156k Q
CHECK:
(@) Measureresistance betweenterminals OT+and OT - of

the transmission wire connector and body ground.
(b) Measureresistance betweenterminals OT2+and OT2 -
of the transmission wire connector and body ground.

‘o
o

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or higher

ture sensor).

NG> Replace the transmission wire (ATF tempera-
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2 [ Measure resistance between terminal OIL, OIL2 and E2 of Engine and ECT ECU

W

E2

I

OlL2 OIL

B16706

@

connector.
PREPARATION:
(@ Connect the transmission wire connector.
Lo it abh (b) Disconnect the connector of the Engine and ECT ECU.
(s sl o) CHECK:

(@ Measure the resistance between terminals OIL and E2.

(b) Measure the resistance between terminals OIL2 and E2.
OK:

79 Q - 156 kQ
CHECK:

Measure resistance between terminals OIL, OIL2 and E2 of the
Engine and ECT ECU connector and body ground.

OK:
Resistance: 1 MQ or higher

NG Repair or replace the harness or connector
(See page IN-38).

(See page IN-38).

Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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